Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3825
(UTC 304) Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

(UTC 304) Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 25.

Under section 30-3837(b), the party seeking a modification of a trust must affirmatively demonstrate that all beneficiaries have consented to the modification. The issue of consent for unknown beneficiaries must be resolved pursuant to this section and section 30-3826. In re Trust of Shire, 299 Neb. 25, 907 N.W.2d 263 (2018).